Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 5. Direct Offices of Foreign Banks.

§ 81-25-101.
Intention.

Consistent with the federal International Banking Act, the Bank Holding Company Act, the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, and the Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act, this article is intended:

To authorize banking activities and operations, under Mississippi licenses issued by the commissioner, of branch and agency offices in the State of Mississippi of foreign banks, generally under terms and conditions not less favorable than the terms and conditions under which such activities and operations may be conducted by federal branch or agency offices of foreign banks in the United States, and to set forth a statutory framework for the licensing, regulation and supervision of such Mississippi-licensed offices of foreign banks by the commissioner to assure the safe and sound operation of such offices that are licensed under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and

To authorize representative offices in the State of Mississippi of foreign banks, and to set forth statutory provisions governing the licensing and supervision of such offices by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 24, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-103.
Prohibited transactions.

No foreign bank shall transact business in the State of Mississippi except at a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency which it is licensed to establish and maintain pursuant to, and at which it conducts such activities as are permitted by, this chapter.

Subsection (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit:

Any foreign bank which establishes and maintains a federal agency or federal branch in the State of Mississippi from transacting at such federal agency or federal branch such business as it may be authorized to transact under applicable federal laws and regulations or from exercising any right otherwise extended to it under applicable federal law or regulation;

Any foreign bank which does not maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency from making in the State of Mississippi loans secured by liens on real or personal property located in the State of Mississippi or enforcing such loans in the State of Mississippi;

Any foreign bank which does not maintain a Mississippi branch from transacting trust business in the State of Mississippi as long as the trust business is not conducted from an office or location in the State of Mississippi and is otherwise authorized by law;

Any foreign bank which maintains a Mississippi branch or agency from transacting business as agent for an affiliated depository or other institution in accordance with provisions of this chapter; or

Any foreign bank organized under the laws of a territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa or the Virgin Islands, the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, from establishing and operating an interstate branch in the State of Mississippi in its capacity as a “state bank” as defined in the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, pursuant to the authorities contained in that act and in the laws of the State of Mississippi.

For purposes of subsection (1), no foreign bank shall be deemed to be transacting business in the State of Mississippi merely because a subsidiary or affiliate transacts business in the State of Mississippi, including business that any depository institution subsidiary or affiliate may lawfully conduct in the State of Mississippi as an agent for the foreign bank in accordance with and to the extent authorized by the laws of the State of Mississippi and applicable regulations or orders of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 25, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-105.
Application to procure a license.

A foreign bank, in order to procure a license under this chapter to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall submit an application to the commissioner. Such application shall contain:

The same information as required by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System for an application to establish a branch or agency, as the case may be, in the United States;

An instrument irrevocably appointing the commissioner or his or her successors in office to be such foreign bank’s agent, representative and attorney to receive service of any lawful judicial and administrative process in accordance with this chapter; and

Such additional information as the commissioner may require by regulation or order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 26, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-107.
Application procedures.

A foreign bank making an application under this chapter for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall deliver to the commissioner:

At least two (2) (or more as the commissioner may require by regulation) duplicate originals of the foreign bank’s application; and

At least two (2) (or more as the commissioner may require by regulation) copies of its charter or articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the proper officer of the country of such foreign bank’s organization.

The commissioner shall issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency if he or she finds that:

The foreign bank is of good character and sound financial standing;

The management of the foreign bank and the proposed management of the Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency are adequate;

The convenience and needs of persons to be served by the proposed Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency will be promoted; and

The foreign bank satisfies such other standards as the commissioner may establish by regulation.

If the commissioner determines to issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, he or she shall, when all fees have been paid as required under this chapter:

Endorse on each document filed as part of the application the word “Filed,” and the date of the filing thereof and return to the foreign bank a copy of each document so endorsed;

File in his or her office one (1) of such duplicate originals of the application and copies of the charter or articles of incorporation and amendments thereto; and

Issue a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency to such foreign bank.

Each license issued to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall state fully the name of the foreign bank to which such license is issued, and all such other information as the commissioner may require by regulation or order.

The commissioner may, by regulation or order, prescribe abbreviated application procedures and standards applicable to applications by foreign banks that have already established an initial Mississippi state branch or agency, subsequently to establish additional intrastate Mississippi state branches or agencies, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 27, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-109.
Application fee.

Upon applying to the commissioner under this chapter for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or state agency, a foreign bank shall pay to the commissioner an application fee in such amount and in such manner as the commissioner shall require by regulation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 28, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-111.
License prohibitions.

No foreign bank which is licensed under this chapter to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall concurrently maintain a federal branch or federal agency in the State of Mississippi.

No foreign bank which maintains a federal branch or federal agency in the State of Mississippi shall concurrently be licensed under this chapter to maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 29, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-113.
Regulation of operations.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this article or in regulations or orders adopted by the commissioner, and notwithstanding any other law or regulation of the State of Mississippi to the contrary, operations of a foreign bank at a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall be conducted with the same rights, privileges and powers as a Mississippi state bank at the same location and shall be subject to all the same duties, restrictions, penalties, liabilities, conditions, and limitations that would apply under the laws of the State of Mississippi to a Mississippi state bank doing business at the same location; provided, however, that fiduciary activities shall only be conducted from a branch office.

Among other exceptions to the provisions of subsection (1) that may be required or authorized by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of this article:

A Mississippi state branch that was not grandfathered as an “insured branch” within the meaning of Section 6(c)(2) of the federal International Banking Act (12 USCS 3104(c)(2)) may not accept, from citizens or residents of the United States, deposits (other than credit balances that are incidental to or arise out of its exercise of other lawful banking powers) of less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), except to the extent that such deposits are determined by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation not to constitute “domestic retail deposit activities requiring deposit insurance protection” within the meaning of Section 6 of the federal International Banking Act (12 USCS 3104);

A Mississippi state agency may not accept any deposits from citizens or residents of the United States (other than credit balances that are incidental to or arise out of its exercise of other lawful banking powers), but it may accept deposits from persons who are neither citizens nor residents of the United States;

A Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall not be required to maintain federal or state deposit insurance under any law, regulation, or order of the State of Mississippi that requires Mississippi state banks and other depository institutions to maintain such deposit insurance, and the commissioner may, by regulation or order, exclude or exempt uninsured Mississippi state branches and/or Mississippi agencies from, or otherwise modify the applicability to uninsured Mississippi state branches and/or Mississippi agencies of, any law or regulation of the State of Mississippi that is generally applicable to insured Mississippi state banks, or that would otherwise be applicable to an insured Mississippi state bank doing business at the same location, as the commissioner may deem necessary or desirable, taking into account applicable limitations on the retail deposit-taking powers and privileges of Mississippi state branches and Mississippi agencies;

Any limitation or restriction based on the capital stock and surplus of a Mississippi state bank shall be deemed to refer, as applied to a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, to the dollar equivalent of the capital stock and surplus of the foreign bank, and if the foreign bank has more than one Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency in this State, the business transacted by all such state branches and Mississippi state agencies shall be aggregated in determining compliance with the limitation; and

The commissioner is expressly authorized to adopt such additional or modify the applicability of any existing standards, conditions or requirements, by regulation or order, as he or she may deem necessary to ensure the safety and soundness and the protection of creditors of the operations of branches and agencies of foreign banks in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 30, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-115.
Certificate of authority.

No foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch shall engage in fiduciary activities at such branch office unless such foreign bank shall have first obtained a certificate of authority from the commissioner to engage in fiduciary activities at such office.

An application to obtain a certificate of authority to engage in fiduciary activities shall be in such form and contain such information, and be accompanied by such reasonable fee, as the commissioner may require by regulation. The commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to engage in fiduciary activities to a foreign bank making an application under this section if he or she finds that such foreign bank will exercise fiduciary powers in accordance with the laws and regulations of the State of Mississippi.

A foreign bank which holds a certificate of authority issued under this section may engage at its Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency in fiduciary activities to the same extent and in the same manner as if such foreign bank were a Mississippi state bank.

A foreign bank which holds a certificate of authority issued under this section shall file all such reports, pay all such reasonable fees, and be subject to examination and supervision as the commissioner may determine by regulation.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a certificate to engage in fiduciary activities issued under this section if he or she finds:

That conditions exist which would authorize the commissioner under this chapter to revoke or suspend such foreign bank’s license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch; or

Any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the foreign bank’s original application to obtain a certificate of authority to engage in fiduciary activities, would have resulted in the commissioner refusing to issue such certificate of authority to the foreign bank.

Fiduciary activities shall not be permitted at agency or representative offices.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 31, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-117.
Permissible and prohibited activities.

A Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency of a foreign bank licensed under this chapter may receive deposits, renew time deposits, close loans, service loans, and receive payments on loans and other obligations as an agent for any depository institution affiliate of such foreign bank, including branch, agency and other offices of the same foreign bank located in other states, generally in accordance with the same terms, conditions, procedures and requirements that are applicable under the laws and regulations of Mississippi to such agency activities that may be conducted by Mississippi state banks.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the laws or regulations of the State of Mississippi, a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency of a foreign bank acting in the State of Mississippi as an agent in accordance with the provisions of this section shall not be considered to be a branch of such other depository institution affiliate; however, no Mississippi state branch or Mississippi agency shall be authorized by this section to act as agent for a branch or agency of an affiliated foreign bank other than the foreign bank which has been licensed to transact business in the State of Mississippi pursuant to this chapter.

A Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency of a foreign bank licensed under this chapter may not:

Conduct any activity as an agent under this section which such office is prohibited from conducting as a principal under any applicable federal or state law, including but not limited to the acceptance of impermissible deposits; or

As a principal, have an agent conduct any activity under this section which such office is prohibited from conducting under any applicable federal or state law, including but not limited to the acceptance of impermissible deposits.

An agency relationship between a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency of a foreign bank licensed under this chapter and a depository institution affiliate or other affiliate of such foreign bank shall in any event be on terms that are consistent with safe and sound banking practices and all applicable regulations and orders of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 32, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-119.
Establishment and maintenance of a Mississippi state representative office.

No foreign bank shall establish or maintain a Mississippi state representative office unless such foreign bank is licensed by the commissioner to maintain such a Mississippi representative office.

Nothing in subsection (1) shall be deemed to prohibit a foreign bank which maintains a federal agency or federal branch in the State of Mississippi from establishing or maintaining one or more Mississippi representative offices.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 33, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-121.
Application for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office.

The application for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office shall be in writing under oath and shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may require by regulation or order. The application shall be accompanied by a reasonable fee as the commissioner may establish by regulation.

Each application to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office shall include an instrument irrevocably appointing the commissioner or his or her successors in office to be such foreign bank’s agent, representative and attorney to receive service of any lawful judicial and administrative process in accordance with Section 81-25-101.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 34, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-123.
Application procedures.

A foreign bank making an application for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office shall deliver to the commissioner two (2) (or more as the commissioner may require by regulation) duplicate originals of the foreign bank’s application.

The commissioner shall issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office if he or she finds that:

The foreign bank is of good character and sound financial standing;

The management of the foreign banks and the proposed management of the Mississippi representative office are adequate; and

The convenience and needs of persons to be served by the proposed Mississippi representative office will be promoted.

If the commissioner determines to issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office, he or she shall, when all fees have been paid as required under this chapter:

Endorse on each duplicate original of the application the word “Filed,” and the date of the filing thereof and return to the foreign bank one (1) such duplicate original so endorsed;

File in his or her office one (1) of such duplicate originals of the application; and

Issue a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office to such foreign bank.

Each license issued to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office shall state fully the name of the foreign bank to which such license is issued, the address or addresses at which such Mississippi representative office is to be located and all such other information as the commissioner may require by regulation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 35, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-125.
Permissible activities.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office may, subject to such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, engage in the following activities:

Solicitation for loans and in connection therewith the assembly of credit information, making of property inspections and appraisals, securing of title information, preparation of applications for loans including making recommendations with respect to action thereon, solicitation of investors to purchase loans from the foreign bank, and the search for such investors to contract with the foreign bank for servicing of such loans;

The solicitation of new business;

The conduct of research; and

Back office administrative functions as may be more specifically defined in regulations issued by the commissioner.

Any other activity which the foreign bank seeks to conduct at such office shall be subject to the prior written approval of the commissioner by general regulation or upon application in such form as the commissioner shall require by regulation or order.

Notwithstanding subsection (1), a Mississippi representative office that is a regional administrative office of the foreign bank, as may be defined more fully by the commissioner in regulations and orders, may engage in credit approval activities if the foreign bank (a) gives forty-five (45) days prior written notice to the commissioner; and (b) the commissioner does not object within such forty-five (45) day period to the conduct of such activities by the Mississippi representative office. Written notice under this subsection shall be in such a form and contain such information as the commissioner shall require by regulation or order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 36, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-127.
Revocation of license.

The commissioner, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, may revoke a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office if he or she finds:

The foreign bank has violated any provision of this chapter or any other law, rule or regulation of the State of Mississippi; or

Any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the foreign bank’s original application for such license, would have resulted in the commissioner refusing to issue such license to the foreign bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 37, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-129.
Posting of license.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall post its license in a conspicuous place at such office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 38, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-131.
License transfer restriction.

No license issued by the commissioner in accordance with this chapter shall be transferable or assignable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 39, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-133.
Filing of instrument to appoint commissioner as agent, representative and attorney.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency, or Mississippi representative office shall file with the commissioner an instrument irrevocably appointing the commissioner and his or her successors in office to be such foreign bank’s agent, representative and attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any judicial or administrative proceeding against the foreign bank or any of its successors which arises out of the foreign bank’s activities in the State of Mississippi after such appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served directly on the foreign bank or its successor, as the case may be. Such appointment shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may require by regulation or order.

Any foreign bank which establishes a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office and which has not filed with the commissioner an instrument pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed by the establishment of such office to have appointed the commissioner as its agent, representative and attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any judicial or administrative proceeding against the foreign bank or any of its successors which arises out of the foreign bank’s activities in the State of Mississippi, with the same force and validity as if served directly on the foreign bank or its successor, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 40, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-135.
Service of processes, notices and demands.

Service of any lawful process in any judicial or administrative proceeding against the foreign bank or any of its successors which arises out of the foreign bank’s activities in this state shall be made on the commissioner by delivering to and leaving with him or her, or with any official having charge of his or her office, duplicate copies of such process, notice or demand. If any process, notice or demand is served on the commissioner, he or she shall immediately cause a copy thereof to be forwarded by registered mail addressed to such foreign bank at its principal office as the same appears in his or her records. Any service so had on the commissioner shall be returnable in not less than thirty (30) days.

Nothing in this chapter limits or affects the right to serve any process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a foreign corporation in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

The commissioner shall keep a record of all processes, notices and demands served upon him or her under this section and shall record therein the time of such service and his or her action with reference thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 41, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-137.
Filing of amendments to articles of incorporation.

A foreign bank which is licensed to maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, whenever its articles of incorporation are amended, shall forthwith file in the office of the commissioner a copy of such amendment duly authenticated by the proper officer of the country of such foreign bank’s organization, but the filing thereof may not of itself enlarge or alter the purpose or purposes for which such foreign bank is authorized to pursue in the transaction of its business in the State of Mississippi, nor authorize such foreign bank to transact business in the State of Mississippi under any name other than the name set forth in its license, nor extend the duration of its corporate existence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 42, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-139.
Amendment to license.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency must secure an amended license if it changes its corporate name, changes the duration of its corporate existence or desires to pursue in the State of Mississippi other or additional purposes than those set forth in its prior application under this chapter for a license, by making application therefor to the commissioner.

The requirements with respect to the form and contents of an application under subsection (1), the manner of its execution, the filing of duplicate originals thereof with the commissioner, the issuance of an amended license and the effect thereof shall be the same as in the case of an initial application for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 43, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-141.
Notice of acquisition or merger.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall file with the commissioner a notice, in such form and containing such information as the commissioner may prescribe, no later than fourteen (14) calendar days after such foreign bank becomes aware of any acquisition of control of such foreign bank or merges with another foreign bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 44, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-143.
Notice of relocation.

No foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall relocate any such office unless the foreign bank provides prior written notice to commissioner and the commissioner shall have approved such relocation.

Written notice provided by a foreign bank under this section shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner shall require by regulation or order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 45, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-145.
Examination by commissioner.

A Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall be subject to examination by the commissioner at such intervals and in such a manner as he or she shall establish by regulation or order.

In conducting an examination pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall:

Have full access to the offices, books, accounts, and records of each office located in the State of Mississippi as well as all of the books, accounts and records maintained in this state of any office not located in the State of Mississippi of such foreign bank; and

Have authority to require the attendance of and to examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required relative to the activities of such office.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall be assessed a reasonable fee for the expenses incurred by the commissioner in making an examination of such office. Such fee shall be assessed in an amount and in a manner as the commissioner shall establish by regulation.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall be subject to all reasonable fees and expenses in such amounts as the commissioner may require by regulation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 46, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-147.
Power and authority of commissioner.

The commissioner shall have all of the powers granted to him or her by the laws of the State of Mississippi to the extent appropriate to enable him or her to supervise each Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency, or Mississippi representative office.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued under this chapter, he or she may, in addition to any other remedy or action available to the commissioner under the laws of the State of Mississippi, order such person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in such a manner and in such an amount as the commissioner shall determine in accordance with the laws of the State of Mississippi and regulations thereunder.

In order to carry out the purposes under this chapter, the commissioner may:

Enter into cooperative, coordinating or information-sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agency or any organization affiliated or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies;

With respect to periodic examination or other supervision of a foreign bank that maintains a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office, accept reports of examinations performed by, and reports submitted to, other bank supervisory agencies in lieu of conducting examinations, or of receiving reports, as might otherwise be required under this article;

Enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with any other bank supervisory agency having concurrent jurisdiction over any foreign bank, however, the commissioner may at any time take any such actions independently if the commissioner determines that such actions are necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter and to ensure compliance with the laws of the State of Mississippi;

Enter into contracts with any bank supervisory agency having concurrent regulatory or supervisory jurisdiction over a foreign bank maintaining a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office, to engage the services of such agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation or provide the services of the commissioner’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation, provided that such contracts shall be in accordance with the policies and administrative procedures of the Mississippi State Personnel Board; and

Assess supervisory and examination fees that shall be payable by foreign banks maintaining a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office in connection with the commissioner’s performance of his or her duties under this chapter and in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

Supervisory or examination fees assessed by the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may be shared with other bank supervisory agencies or any organizations affiliated with or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies in accordance with agreements between the commissioner and such agencies or organizations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 47, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-149.
Filing of reports with commissioner.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall file with the commissioner such reports as and when the commissioner may require by regulation or order.

Each report filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any regulation or order issued under this chapter shall be in such form and contain such information, shall be signed in such manner, and shall be verified in such manner, as the commissioner may require by regulation or order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 48, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-151.
All reports subject to subpoena and public access.

All reports of examinations and investigations, correspondence and memoranda concerning or arising out of such examinations and investigations, including any duly authenticated copy of copies thereof in the possession of any foreign bank, shall be subject to subpoena and public access to the same extent as if such information pertained to a Mississippi state bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 49, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-153.
Records to be kept and made available upon request by commissioner.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall maintain at any such office, and make available upon request by the commissioner, appropriate books, accounts and records reflecting (a) all transactions effected by or on behalf of such office and (b) all actions taken in the State of Mississippi by employees of the foreign banking corporation located in the State of Mississippi to effect transactions on behalf of any office of such foreign bank located outside the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 50, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-155.
Separation of assets.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency in Mississippi shall keep the assets of its business in the State of Mississippi separate and apart from the assets of its business outside the State of Mississippi.

The creditors of a foreign bank arising out of transactions with, and recorded on the books of, its Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall be entitled to absolute preference and priority over the creditors of such foreign bank’s offices located outside the State of Mississippi with respect to the assets of such foreign bank in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 51, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-157.
Requirement to give notice that deposits and credit balances are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall, in a manner established by the commissioner by regulation or order, give notice that deposits and credit balances in such office are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 52, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-159.
Limitations.

A foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall be subject to the same limitations with respect to the payment of interest on deposits as a state bank which is a member of the Federal Reserve System.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 53, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-161.
Required securities.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall keep on deposit, in accordance with such regulations or orders as the commissioner may promulgate, with such unaffiliated Mississippi banks as such foreign bank may designate and the commissioner may approve, interest-bearing stocks and bonds, notes, debentures, or other obligations of the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or guaranteed by the United States, or of this state, or of a city, county, town, village, school district, or instrumentality of this state or guaranteed by this state, or dollar deposits, or obligations of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, or obligations issued by the InterAmerican Development Bank, or obligations of the Asian Development Bank, or obligations issued by the African Development Bank, or such other assets as the commissioner shall by regulation or order permit, to an aggregate amount to be determined by the commissioner, based upon principal amount or market value, whichever is lower, in the case of the above-described securities, and subject to such limitations as he or she shall prescribe.

The commissioner may from time to time require that the assets deposited pursuant to this section may be maintained by the foreign bank in such amount, in such form and subject to such conditions as he or she shall deem necessary or desirable for the maintenance of a sound financial condition, the protection of depositors and the public interest, and to maintain public confidence in the business of such Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency. The commissioner may give credit to reserves required to be maintained with a federal reserve bank in or outside the State of Mississippi pursuant to federal law, in accordance with such regulations or procedures as the commissioner may promulgate.

So long as it shall continue business in the ordinary course, such foreign bank shall be permitted to collect interest on the securities deposited under this section and from time to time exchange, examine and compare such securities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 54, eff from and after May 1, 1997.